Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.120

Additional bond.

Should such officer, after due notice, fail to appear at the time appointed, the matter may be heard and determined in his or her absence; if after examination the board of county commissioners shall be of opinion that the bond of such officer has become insufficient from any cause whatever, they shall require an additional bond with such security as may be deemed necessary, which said additional bond shall be executed and filed within such time as the board of county commissioners may order; and if any such officer shall fail to execute and file such additional bond within the time prescribed by such order, his or her office shall become vacant.

[ 2012 c 117 s 101; 1890 p 36 s 7; RRS s 9936.]

NOTES:

Failure to give or renew official bond a cause for vacation of office: RCW 42.12.010.